Hawaii statutes.
§431:11-105 Registration of insurers. [Section
effective January 1, 2016. For section effective until December 31, 2015, see
below.] (a) Every insurer that is authorized to do business in this State
and is a member of an insurance holding company system shall register with the
commissioner, except a foreign insurer subject to registration requirements and
standards adopted by statute or regulation in the jurisdiction of its domicile
that are substantially similar to those contained in this section and section
431:11-106(a)(1), (b), and (d). The insurer shall file a copy of the summary
of its registration statement as required by subsection (c) in each state in
which that insurer is authorized to do business if requested by the
commissioner of that state. Any insurer that is subject to registration under
this section shall register within fifteen days after it becomes subject to
registration, and annually thereafter by March 15 of each year for the previous
calendar year, unless the commissioner for good cause shown extends the time
for registration, and then within the extended time. The commissioner may
require any insurer authorized to do business in the state that is a member of
an insurance holding company system, and that is not subject to registration
under this section, to furnish a copy of the registration statement or other
information filed by the insurance company with the insurance regulatory
authority of its domiciliary jurisdiction.

(b) Every insurer subject to registration
shall file the registration statement with the commissioner on a form and in a
format prescribed by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, which
shall contain the following current information:

(1) The capital structure, general financial
condition, ownership, and management of the insurer and any person controlling
the insurer;

(2) The identity and relationship of every member of
the insurance holding company system;

(3) The following agreements in force, and
transactions currently outstanding or that have occurred during the last
calendar year between the insurer and its affiliates:

(A) Loans, other investments, or purchases,
sales, or exchanges of securities of the affiliates by the insurer or of the
insurer by its affiliates;

(B) Purchases, sales, or exchange of assets;

(C) Transactions not in the ordinary course of
business;

(D) Guarantees or undertakings for the benefit
of an affiliate that result in an actual contingent exposure of the insurer's
assets to liability, other than insurance contracts entered into in the
ordinary course of the insurer's business;

(E) All management agreements, all service
contracts, and all cost-sharing arrangements;

(F) Reinsurance agreements;

(G) Dividends and other distributions to
shareholders; and

(H) Consolidated tax allocation agreements;

(4) Any pledge of the insurer's stock, including
stock of any subsidiary or controlling affiliate, for a loan made to any member
of the insurance holding company system;

(5) If requested by the commissioner, financial
statements of an insurance holding company system. Financial statements may
include but are not limited to annual audited financial statements filed with
the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to the Securities Act of 1933,
as amended, or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. An insurer
required to file financial statements pursuant to this paragraph may satisfy
the request by providing the commissioner with the most recently filed
financial statements of the parent corporation that have been filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission;

(6) Other matters concerning transactions between
registered insurers and any affiliates as may be included from time to time in
any registration forms adopted or approved by the commissioner; and

(7) Statements that the insurer's board of directors
oversees corporate governance and internal controls and that the insurer's
officers or senior management have approved, implemented, and continue to
maintain and monitor corporate governance and internal control procedures.

(c) All registration statements shall contain
a summary outlining all items in the current registration statement
representing changes from the prior registration statement.

(d) No information need be disclosed on the
registration statement filed pursuant to subsection (b) if the information is
not material for the purposes of this section. Unless the commissioner by rule
or order provides otherwise, sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions
of credit, investments, or guarantees involving one-half of one per cent or
less of an insurer's admitted assets as of the December 31 next preceding shall
not be deemed material for purposes of this section.

(e) Subject to section 431:11-106(b), each
registered insurer shall report to the commissioner all dividends and other
distributions to shareholders within fifteen business days following the
declaration thereof.

(f) Any person within an insurance holding
company system subject to registration shall be required to provide complete
and accurate information to an insurer, where the information is reasonably
necessary to enable the insurer to comply with the provisions of this article.

(g) The commissioner shall terminate the
registration of any insurer that demonstrates that it no longer is a member of
an insurance holding company system.

(h) The commissioner may require or allow two
or more affiliated insurers subject to registration to file a consolidated
registration statement.

(i) The commissioner may allow an insurer that
is authorized to do business in this State and is part of an insurance holding
company system to register on behalf of any affiliated insurer that is required
to register under subsection (a) and to file all information and material
required to be filed under this section.

(j) The provisions of this section shall not
apply to any insurer, information, or transaction if and to the extent that the
commissioner by rule or order shall exempt the same from the provisions of this
section.

(k) Any person may file with the commissioner
a disclaimer of affiliation with any authorized insurer or a disclaimer may be
filed by the insurer or any member of an insurance holding company system. The
disclaimer shall fully disclose all material relationships and bases for
affiliation between the person and the insurer as well as the basis for
disclaiming the affiliation. A disclaimer of affiliation shall be deemed to
have been granted unless the commissioner, within thirty days following receipt
of a complete disclaimer, notifies the filing party that the disclaimer is
disallowed. In the event of disallowance, the disclaiming party may request an
administrative hearing, which shall be granted. The disclaiming party shall be
relieved of its duty to register under this section if approval of the
disclaimer has been granted by the commissioner, or if the disclaimer is deemed
to have been approved.

(l) The ultimate controlling person of every
insurer subject to registration shall also file an annual enterprise risk
report. The ultimate controlling person of a domestic insurance holding
company system shall be exempt from this requirement. The report shall
identify, to the best of the ultimate controlling person's knowledge and
belief, the material risks within the insurance holding company system that
could pose enterprise risk to the insurer. The report shall be filed with the
lead state commissioner of the insurance holding company system as determined
by the procedures within the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(m) The failure to file a registration
statement, any summary of the registration statement, or enterprise risk filing
required by this section within the time specified for the filing shall be a
violation of this section. [L 1987, c 349, pt of §8; am L 1993, c 321, §15; am
L 2000, c 182, §12; am L 2014, c 234, §10]

§431:11-105 Registration of insurers. [Section
effective until December 31, 2015. For section effective January 1, 2016, see
above.] (a) Every insurer who is authorized to do business in this State
and who is a member of an insurance holding company system shall register with
the commissioner, except a foreign insurer subject to registration requirements
and standards adopted by statute or regulation in the jurisdiction of its
domicile that are substantially similar to those contained in this section and
section 431:11-106(a)(1), (b), and (d). The insurer shall file a copy of the
summary of its registration statement as required by subsection (c) in each
state in which that insurer is authorized to do business if requested by the
commissioner of that state. Any insurer who is subject to registration under
this section shall register within fifteen days after it becomes subject to
registration, and annually thereafter by March 15 of each year for the previous
calendar year, unless the commissioner for good cause shown extends the time
for registration, and then within the extended time. The commissioner may
require any insurer who is a member of a holding company system who is not
subject to registration under this section to furnish a copy of the
registration statement or other information filed by the insurance company with
the insurance regulatory authority of domiciliary jurisdiction.

(b) Every insurer subject to registration
shall file the registration statement on a form prescribed by the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners, which shall contain the following
current information:

(1) The capital structure, general financial
condition, ownership, and management of the insurer and any person controlling
the insurer;

(2) The identity and relationship of every member of
the insurance holding company system;

(3) The following agreements in force, and
transactions currently outstanding or which have occurred during the last
calendar year between such insurer and its affiliates:

(A) Loans, other investments, or purchases,
sales or exchanges of securities of the affiliates by the insurer or of the
insurer by its affiliates;

(B) Purchases, sales, or exchange of assets;

(C) Transactions not in the ordinary course of
business;

(D) Guarantees or undertakings for the benefit
of an affiliate which result in an actual contingent exposure of the insurer's
assets to liability, other than insurance contracts entered into in the
ordinary course of the insurer's business;

(E) All management agreements, service
contracts and all cost-sharing arrangements;

(F) Reinsurance agreements;

(G) Dividends and other distributions to
shareholders; and

(H) Consolidated tax allocation agreements;

(4) Any pledge of the insurer's stock, including
stock of any subsidiary or controlling affiliate, for a loan made to any member
of the insurance holding company system; and

(5) Other matters concerning transactions between
registered insurers and any affiliates as may be included from time to time in
any registration forms adopted or approved by the commissioner.

(c) All registration statements shall contain
a summary outlining all items in the current registration statement
representing changes from the prior registration statement.

(d) No information need be disclosed on the
registration statement filed pursuant to subsection (b) if the information is
not material for the purposes of this section. Unless the commissioner by rule
or order provides otherwise, sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions
of credit, investments, or guarantees involving one-half of one per cent or
less of an insurer's admitted assets as of the thirty-first day of December
next preceding shall not be deemed material for purposes of this section.

(e) Subject to section 431:11-106(b), each
registered insurer shall report to the commissioner all dividends and other
distributions to shareholders within fifteen business days following the
declaration thereof.

(f) Any person within an insurance holding
company system subject to registration shall be required to provide complete
and accurate information to an insurer, where the information is reasonably necessary
to enable the insurer to comply with the provisions of this article.

(g) The commissioner shall terminate the
registration of any insurer which demonstrates that it no longer is a member of
an insurance holding company system.

(h) The commissioner may require or allow two
or more affiliated insurers subject to registration to file a consolidated
registration statement.

(i) The commissioner may allow an insurer who
is authorized to do business in this State and who is part of an insurance
holding company system to register on behalf of any affiliated insurer who is
required to register under subsection (a) and to file all information and
material required to be filed under this section.

(j) The provisions of this section shall not
apply to any insurer, information, or transaction if and to the extent that the
commissioner by rule or order shall exempt the same from the provisions of this
section.

(k) Any person may file with the commissioner
a disclaimer of affiliation with any authorized insurer or a disclaimer may be
filed by the insurer or any member of an insurance holding company system. The
disclaimer shall fully disclose all material relationships and bases for
affiliation between the person and the insurer as well as the basis for disclaiming
the affiliation. After a disclaimer has been filed, the insurer shall be
relieved of any duty to register or report under this section which may arise
out of the insurer's relationship with the person unless and until the
commissioner disallows the disclaimer. The commissioner shall disallow a
disclaimer only after furnishing all parties in interest with notice and
opportunity to be heard and after making specific findings of fact to support
the disallowance.

(l) The failure to file a registration
statement or any summary of the registration statement required by this section
within the time specified for such filing shall be a violation of this section.
[L 1987, c 349, pt of §8; am L 1993, c 321, §15; am L 2000, c 182, §12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next